Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1037.
do enact as follows:SB1037,11Section 1. 20.155 (3) (g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1037,2,4220.155 (3) (g) Broadband expansion grants; program revenue funding. All 3moneys received as broadband grant reimbursements under s. 196.504 (2g) (b) for 4making broadband expansion grants under s. 196.504.SB1037,25Section 2. 196.504 (1) (aa) of the statutes is created to read:SB1037,2,76196.504 (1) (aa) “Broadband infrastructure” means infrastructure for the 7provision of broadband service at the following speeds, whichever is faster:SB1037,2,981. A minimum download speed of 100 megabits per second and a minimum 9upload speed of 20 megabits per second.SB1037,2,13102. The minimum upload and download speeds for advanced 11telecommunications capability as designated by the federal communications 12commission in its most recent inquiry regarding advanced telecommunications 13capability under 47 USC 1302 (b).SB1037,314Section 3. 196.504 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1037,3,515196.504 (2) (a) To make broadband expansion grants to eligible applicants for 16the purpose of constructing broadband infrastructure in unserved areas designated 1under par. (e). An eligible applicant shall specify in its application for a grant the 2broadband infrastructure the applicant intends to construct with the grant. Grants 3awarded under this section shall be paid from the appropriations under ss. 20.155 4(3) (g), (r), and (rm) and 20.866 (2) (z), in the amount allocated under s. 20.866 (2) (z) 55.SB1037,46Section 4. 196.504 (2g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1037,3,127196.504 (2g) (a) The commission shall require a person who receives a grant 8under sub. (2) (a) to submit reports to the commission on the progress of 9construction activities for the broadband infrastructure specified in the person’s 10grant application, the number of broadband service connections provided by that 11infrastructure after construction is completed, and the average download and 12upload speeds for those service connections.SB1037,3,1413(b) A person who receives a grant under sub. (2) (a) shall reimburse the 14commission an amount equal to the grant if any of the following applies:SB1037,3,16151. The person fails to complete construction of the broadband infrastructure 16specified in the person’s application under sub. (2) (a).SB1037,3,18172. The broadband infrastructure constructed with the grant fails to provide 18broadband service at speeds specified in sub. (1) (aa).SB1037,3,2219(c) The commission shall promulgate rules for submitting reports under par. 20(a) and making reimbursements under par. (b). If a person fails to make a 21reimbursement as required under the rules, the person is not eligible for any other 22grant under sub. (2) (a).SB1037,523Section 5. 196.504 (2r) of the statutes is created to read:SB1037,4,31196.504 (2r) Biennially, beginning on January 1, 2027, the legislative audit 2bureau shall conduct a performance evaluation audit of the broadband expansion 3grant program under sub. (2) (a).SB1037,4,44